Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-332
Acquisition of real estate by commission; bordering on lakes or artificial reservoirs; purpose.

The commission is authorized and empowered to acquire by gift, devise, or purchase real estate bordering on the shore of any lake or artificial reservoir constructed for the storage of water, for the purpose of developing public recreation areas and promoting the conservation of natural resources.

Laws 1947, c. 141, § 1, p. 386;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-424;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 90.